Illinois, session 104th, SB1949.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1062.2 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1062.2)7    Sec. 5-1062.2. Stormwater management.8    (a) The purpose of this Section is to allow management and 9mitigation of the effects of urbanization on stormwater 10drainage in all counties not otherwise covered in Section 115-1062, 5-1062.1, or 5-1062.3 the metropolitan counties of 12Madison, St. Clair, Monroe, Kankakee, Grundy, LaSalle, DeKalb, 13Kendall, and Boone as well as all counties containing all or a 14part of an urbanized area and references to "county" in this 15Section apply only to those counties. This Section does not 16apply to counties in the Chicago Metropolitan Agency for 17Planning that are granted authorities in Section 5-1062. The 18purpose of this Section shall be achieved by:19        (1) Consolidating the existing stormwater management 20    framework into a united, countywide structure.21        (2) Setting minimum standards for floodplain and 22    stormwater management with an emphasis on the use of 23    cost-effective solutions to flooding problems.  SB1949- 2 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1        (3) Preparing a countywide plan for the management of 2    stormwater runoff, including the management of natural and 3    man-made drainageways. The countywide plan may incorporate 4    watershed plans and shall evaluate and address flooding 5    problems that exist in urbanized areas that are a result 6    of urban flooding.7    (a-5) This Section also applies to all counties not 8otherwise covered in Section 5-1062, 5-1062.2, or 5-1062.3 if 9the question of allowing the county board to establish a 10stormwater management planning council has been submitted to 11the electors of the county and approved by a majority of those 12voting on the question. 13    (b) A stormwater management planning committee may be 14established by county board resolution, with its membership 15consisting of equal numbers of county board and municipal 16representatives from each county board district, one member 17representing drainage districts, and one member representing 18soil and water conservation districts and such other members 19as may be determined by the stormwater management planning 20committee members. If the county has more than 6 county board 21districts, however, the county board may by ordinance divide 22the county into not less than 6 areas of approximately equal 23population, to be used instead of county board districts for 24the purpose of determining representation on the stormwater 25management planning committee.26    The county board members shall be appointed by the   SB1949- 3 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1chairman of the county board. Municipal members from each 2county board district or other represented area shall be 3appointed by a majority vote of the mayors of those 4municipalities that have the greatest percentage of their 5respective populations residing in that county board district 6or other represented area. The member representing drainage 7districts shall be appointed by the drainage district 8chairperson or by a majority vote of all drainage district 9chairpersons in the county if more than one drainage district 10exists in the county. The member representing soil and water 11conservation districts shall be appointed by a majority vote 12of the soil and water conservation district board or by a 13majority vote of all soil and water conservation district 14boards in the county if more than one soil and water 15conservation district board exists in the county. All 16municipal, county board, drainage district, and soil and water 17conservation district representatives shall be entitled to a 18vote; the other members shall be nonvoting members, unless 19authorized to vote by the unanimous consent of the voting 20members of the committee; however, Madison, St. Clair, Monroe, 21Kankakee, Grundy, LaSalle, DeKalb, Kendall, and Boone counties 22are not required to have a drainage district or a soil and 23water conservation representative. A municipality that is 24located in more than one county may choose, at the time of 25formation of the stormwater management planning committee and 26based on watershed boundaries, to participate in the   SB1949- 4 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1stormwater management planning program of either or both of 2the counties. Subcommittees of the stormwater management 3planning committee may be established to serve a portion of 4the county or a particular drainage basin that has similar 5stormwater management needs. The stormwater management 6planning committee shall adopt bylaws, by a majority vote of 7the county and municipal members, to govern the functions of 8the committee and its subcommittees. Officers of the committee 9shall include a chair and vice chair, one of whom shall be a 10county representative and one a municipal representative.11    The principal duties of the committee shall be to develop 12a stormwater management plan for presentation to and approval 13by the county board, and to direct the plan's implementation 14and revision. The committee may retain engineering, legal, and 15financial advisors and inspection personnel. The committee 16shall meet at least quarterly and shall hold at least one 17public meeting during the preparation of the plan and prior to 18its submittal to the county board. The committee may make 19grants to: (1) units of local government; (2) not-for-profit 20organizations; and (3) landowners. In order for a municipality 21located partially or wholly within a mapped floodplain to 22receive grant moneys, the municipality must be a member in the 23Federal Emergency Management Agency's National Flood Insurance 24Program. A municipality receiving grant moneys must have 25adopted an ordinance requiring actions consistent with the 26stormwater management plan. Use of the grant money must be   SB1949- 5 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1consistent with the stormwater management plan.2    The committee shall not have or exercise any power of 3eminent domain. 4    (c) In the preparation of a stormwater management plan, a 5county stormwater management planning committee shall 6coordinate the planning process with each adjoining county to 7ensure that recommended stormwater projects will have no 8significant impact on the levels or flows of stormwaters in 9inter-county watersheds or on the capacity of existing and 10planned stormwater retention facilities. An adopted stormwater 11management plan shall identify steps taken by the county to 12coordinate the development of plan recommendations with 13adjoining counties.14    (d) The stormwater management committee may not enforce 15any rules or regulations that would interfere with (i) any 16power granted by the Illinois Drainage Code (70 ILCS 605/) to 17operate, construct, maintain, or improve drainage systems or 18(ii) the ability to operate, maintain, or improve the drainage 19systems used on or by land or a facility used for production 20agriculture purposes, as defined in the Use Tax Act (35 ILCS 21105/), except newly constructed buildings and newly installed 22impervious paved surfaces. Disputes regarding an exception 23shall be determined by a mutually agreed upon arbitrator paid 24by the disputing party or parties.25    (e) Before the stormwater management planning committee 26recommends to the county board a stormwater management plan   SB1949- 6 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1for the county or a portion thereof, it shall submit the plan 2to the Office of Water Resources of the Department of Natural 3Resources for review and recommendations. The Office, in 4reviewing the plan, shall consider such factors as impacts on 5the levels or flows in rivers and streams and the cumulative 6effects of stormwater discharges on flood levels. The Office 7of Water Resources shall determine whether the plan or 8ordinances enacted to implement the plan complies with the 9requirements of subsection (f). Within a period not to exceed 1060 days, the review comments and recommendations shall be 11submitted to the stormwater management planning committee for 12consideration. Any amendments to the plan shall be submitted 13to the Office for review.14    (f) Prior to recommending the plan to the county board, 15the stormwater management planning committee shall hold at 16least one public hearing thereon and shall afford interested 17persons an opportunity to be heard. The hearing shall be held 18in the county seat. Notice of the hearing shall be published at 19least once no less than 15 days in advance of the hearing in a 20newspaper of general circulation published in the county. The 21notice shall state the time and place of the hearing and the 22place where copies of the proposed plan will be accessible for 23examination by interested parties. If an affected municipality 24having a stormwater management plan adopted by ordinance 25wishes to protest the proposed county plan provisions, it 26shall appear at the hearing and submit in writing specific   SB1949- 7 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1proposals to the stormwater management planning committee. 2After consideration of the matters raised at the hearing, the 3committee may amend or approve the plan and recommend it to the 4county board for adoption.5    The county board may enact the proposed plan by ordinance. 6If the proposals for modification of the plan made by an 7affected municipality having a stormwater management plan are 8not included in the proposed county plan, and the municipality 9affected by the plan opposes adoption of the county plan by 10resolution of its corporate authorities, approval of the 11county plan shall require an affirmative vote of at least 12two-thirds of the county board members present and voting. If 13the county board wishes to amend the county plan, it shall 14submit in writing specific proposals to the stormwater 15management planning committee. If the proposals are not 16approved by the committee, or are opposed by resolution of the 17corporate authorities of an affected municipality having a 18municipal stormwater management plan, amendment of the plan 19shall require an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of 20the county board members present and voting.21    (g) The county board may prescribe by ordinance reasonable 22rules and regulations for floodplain or stormwater management 23and for governing the location, width, course, and release 24rate of all stormwater runoff channels, streams, and basins in 25the county, in accordance with the adopted stormwater 26management plan. Land, facilities, and drainage district   SB1949- 8 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1facilities used for production agriculture as defined in 2subsection (d) shall not be subjected to regulation by the 3county board or stormwater management committee under this 4Section for floodplain management and for governing location, 5width, course, maintenance, and release rate of stormwater 6runoff channels, streams and basins, or water discharged from 7a drainage district. These rules and regulations shall, at a 8minimum, meet the standards for floodplain management 9established by the Office of Water Resources and the 10requirements of the Federal Emergency Management Agency for 11participation in the National Flood Insurance Program. The 12Commission may not impose more stringent regulations regarding 13water quality on entities discharging in accordance with a 14valid National Pollution Discharge Elimination System permit 15issued under the Environmental Protection Act.16    (h) In accordance with, and if recommended in, the adopted 17stormwater management plan, the county board may adopt a 18schedule of reasonable fees as may be necessary to mitigate 19the effects of increased stormwater runoff resulting from new 20development based on actual costs. The fees shall not exceed 21the cost of satisfying the onsite stormwater retention or 22detention requirements of the adopted stormwater management 23plan. The fees shall be used to finance activities undertaken 24by the county or its included municipalities to mitigate the 25effects of urban stormwater runoff by providing regional 26stormwater retention or detention facilities, as identified in   SB1949- 9 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1the county plan. The county board shall provide for a credit or 2reduction in fees for any onsite retention, detention, 3drainage district assessments, or other similar stormwater 4facility that the developer is required to construct 5consistent with the stormwater management ordinance. All these 6fees collected by the county shall be held in a separate fund, 7and shall be expended only in the watershed within which they 8were collected.9    (i) For the purpose of implementing this Section and for 10the development, design, planning, construction, operation, 11and maintenance of stormwater facilities provided for in the 12stormwater management plan, a county board that has 13established a stormwater management planning committee 14pursuant to this Section may cause an annual tax of not to 15exceed 0.20% of the value, as equalized or assessed by the 16Department of Revenue, of all taxable property in the county 17to be levied upon all the taxable property in the county or 18occupation and use taxes of 1/10 of one cent. The property tax 19shall be in addition to all other taxes authorized by law to be 20levied and collected in the county and shall be in addition to 21the maximum tax rate authorized by law for general county 22purposes. The 0.20% limitation provided in this Section may be 23increased or decreased by referendum at a general election in 24accordance with the provisions of Sections 18-120, 18-125, and 2518-130 of the Property Tax Code (35 ILCS 200/).26    Any revenues generated as a result of ownership or   SB1949- 10 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1operation of facilities or land acquired with the tax funds 2collected pursuant to this subsection shall be held in a 3separate fund and be used either to abate such property tax or 4for implementing this Section.5    However, the tax authorized by this subsection shall not 6be levied until the question of its adoption, either for a 7specified period or indefinitely, has been submitted to the 8electors thereof and approved by a majority of those voting on 9the question. This question may be submitted at any general 10election held in the county after the adoption of a resolution 11by the county board providing for the submission of the 12question to the electors of the county. The county board shall 13certify the resolution and proposition to the proper election 14officials, who shall submit the proposition at an election in 15accordance with the general election law. If a majority of the 16votes cast on the question is in favor of the levy of the tax, 17it may thereafter be levied in the county for the specified 18period or indefinitely, as provided in the proposition. The 19question shall be put in substantially the following form:20        Shall an annual tax be levied for stormwater 21    management purposes (for a period of not more than ..... 22    years) at a rate not exceeding .....% of the equalized 23    assessed value of the taxable property of ..... County? 24Or this question may be submitted at any general election held 25in the county after the adoption of a resolution by the county 26board providing for the submission of the question to the   SB1949- 11 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1electors of the county to authorize use and occupation taxes 2of 1/10 of one cent:3        Shall use and occupation taxes be raised for 4    stormwater management purposes (for a period of not more 5    than ..... years) at a rate of 1/10 of one cent for taxable 6    goods in ..... County?7    Votes shall be recorded as Yes or No. 8    (i-5) Before a county that establishes a stormwater 9management planning council after submission of the question 10to the electors of the county pursuant to subsection (a-5) may 11submit a referendum question to the electors of the county for 12an annual tax under subsection (i), the county shall: 13        (1) adopt and enforce a floodplain management 14    ordinance or a stormwater management ordinance under 15    subsection (g) that has been approved by the Office of 16    Water Resources of the Department of Natural Resources; 17    and18        (2) designate a certified floodplain manager who has 19    been certified by the Association of State Floodplain 20    Managers; however, nothing in this paragraph (2) requires 21    a county to create a new position or designate another 22    individual if the county already has a certified 23    floodplain manager on staff. 24    If a county fails to continually meet any of the 25conditions of this subsection (i-5) after approval of a 26referendum question for an annual tax, the county may not levy   SB1949- 12 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1a tax under subsection (i) until they are in full compliance 2with this subsection (i-5). 3    (j) For those counties that adopt a property tax in 4accordance with the provisions in this Section, the stormwater 5management committee shall offer property tax abatements or 6incentive payments to property owners who construct, maintain, 7and use approved stormwater management devices. For those 8counties that adopt use and occupation taxes in accordance 9with the provisions of this Section, the stormwater 10management     committee may offer tax rebates or incentive 11payments to property owners who construct, maintain, and use 12approved stormwater management devices. The stormwater 13management committee is authorized to offer credits to the 14property tax, if applicable, based on authorized practices 15consistent with the stormwater management plan and approved by 16the committee. Expenses of staff of a stormwater management 17committee that are expended on regulatory project review may 18be no more than 20% of the annual budget of the committee, 19including funds raised under subsections (h) and (i).20    (k) Any county that has adopted a county stormwater 21management plan under this Section may, after 10 days written 22notice receiving consent of the owner or occupant, enter upon 23any lands or waters within the county for the purpose of 24inspecting stormwater facilities or causing the removal of any 25obstruction to an affected watercourse. If consent is denied 26or cannot be reasonably obtained, the county ordinance shall   SB1949- 13 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1provide a process or procedure for an administrative warrant 2to be obtained. The county shall be responsible for any 3damages occasioned thereby.4    (l) Upon petition of the municipality, and based on a 5finding of the stormwater management planning committee, the 6county shall not enforce rules and regulations adopted by the 7county in any municipality located wholly or partly within the 8county that has a municipal stormwater management ordinance 9that is consistent with and at least as stringent as the county 10plan and ordinance, and is being enforced by the municipal 11authorities. On issues that the county ordinance is more 12stringent as deemed by the committee, the county shall only 13enforce rules and regulations adopted by the county on the 14more stringent issues and accept municipal permits. The county 15shall have no more than 60 days to review permits or the 16permits shall be deemed approved.17    (m) A county may issue general obligation bonds for 18implementing any stormwater plan adopted under this Section in 19the manner prescribed in Section 5-1012; except that the 20referendum requirement of Section 5-1012 does not apply to 21bonds issued pursuant to this Section on which the principal 22and interest are to be paid entirely out of funds generated by 23the taxes and fees authorized by this Section.24    (n) The powers authorized by this Section may be 25implemented by the county board for a portion of the county 26subject to similar stormwater management needs.  SB1949- 14 -LRB104 09905 RTM 19975 b1    (o) The powers and taxes authorized by this Section are in 2addition to the powers and taxes authorized by Division 5-15; 3in exercising its powers under this Section, a county shall 4not be subject to the restrictions and requirements of that 5Division.6    (p) As used in this Section:7    "Urban flooding" means the flooding of public and private 8land in urban communities that results from stormwater or 9snowmelt runoff overwhelming the existing drainage 10infrastructure, unrelated to the overflow of any river or 11lake, whether or not that land is located in or near a 12floodplain.13    "Urbanized areas" means a statistical geographic entity 14consisting of a densely settled core created from census 15tracts or blocks and contiguous qualifying territory that 16together have a minimum population of at least 50,000 persons 17and has been delineated as an urbanized area by the United 18States Census Bureau after the most recent decennial census. 19(Source: P.A. 100-758, eff. 1-1-19.)